California, session 20252026, AB684.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 92030 of the Education Code is amended to read:92030. (a) All meetings of the Regents of the University of California shall, except as otherwise provided in this article, be subject to Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(b) For purposes of this section, “Regents of the University of California,” as defined in Section 92020, includes the Academic Senate of the University of California, Board of Admissions and Relations with Schools.